Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2015.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 35-131, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE35-131. Accounting system; reports; notice of deficiency; forms A. In accordance with generally accepted governmental accounting principles, the department of administration shall develop and prescribe for the use of all budget units a uniform accounting system so designed as to ensure compliance with all legal and constitutional requirements, including those respecting receiving, spending and accounting for public monies. B. The department of administration shall maintain complete, accurate and current financial records relating to state monies and to other public monies in the state treasury available to, encumbered by or expended by each budget unit, including trust monies or other monies not subject to appropriation, setting out all revenues, charges against all funds, fund and appropriation balances, interfund transfers, outstanding warrants, checks, electronic funds transfer vouchers and encumbrances, in a manner consistent with the uniform state accounting system, to prepare statewide financial statements in accordance with generally accepted governmental accounting principles. C. Each month the department of administration shall prepare and submit to the governor a report summarizing by budget unit and appropriation or other fund source the information prescribed in subsection B of this section in a form that will most clearly and accurately set out the current fiscal condition of the state and shall furnish to each budget unit a report of its transactions by appropriation or other fund source in a form that will clearly and accurately show the fiscal activity and condition of the appropriation or fund source. D. The responsible official for each budget unit shall monitor reports prepared pursuant to subsection C of this section to identify any projected total deficiency for the budget unit fiscal year. On a determination of a projected deficiency, the official shall take any action necessary to ensure continuing compliance with section 1-254 by notifying the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate and the chairman of the joint legislative budget committee of the deficiency and the reasons for the deficiency. The initial notification of the deficiency shall be followed within ten business days by a report from the responsible budget unit official that includes the following: 1. A complete explanation of the causes of the deficiency. 2. A plan that ensures that the deficiency will be resolved within the fiscal year without supplemental appropriation and that includes the policy and programmatic implications of the deficiency and the plan. 3. A commitment to provide a progress report if the projected degree of deficiency changes substantially. The report shall include additional measures necessary to ensure resolution of the deficiency within the fiscal year. E. On or before December 1 of each year, the director of the department of administration shall submit to the governor a complete report of the financial transactions of the preceding fiscal year and of the financial condition of the state at the end of that year with such comments and supplementary data as the director of the department of administration deems necessary to make the report complete and readily understandable. The report shall include all appropriated and nonappropriated monies in no less detail than the state general fund. F. On or before February 1 of each year, the director of the department of administration and the state treasurer shall submit to the joint legislative budget committee a report explaining any differences between the department of administration's estimate of the previous fiscal year's state general fund ending balance submitted pursuant to subsection E of this section and the state treasurer's estimate of the invested balance, including the state general fund share of that balance, as of June 30 of the previous fiscal year submitted pursuant to section 41-172. G. In preparing the comprehensive annual financial report published in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, the department of administration shall include supplementary schedules that reconcile any differences between the state general fund as reported in the comprehensive annual financial report and the state general fund as reported in the annual financial report required by subsection E of this section. This reconciliation shall address revenues, expenditures and fund balances. H. The director of the department of administration shall prescribe uniform classifications for assets, liabilities, receipts and expenditures and forms for the periodic reporting of financial accounts, transactions and other matters by budget units compatible with the reports required of the director of the department of administration under this section. Such records and accounts shall be maintained and reconciled by budget units.  If required for reporting, the department of administration may establish or delete funds and budget units may maintain additional records for reporting to the federal government or other funding source. I. Each organization that is included in the state's reporting entity as defined by generally accepted accounting principles shall submit all necessary, accurate and complete final financial statements or information to the department of administration on a basis of accounting that is consistent with generally accepted accounting principles and that is in accordance with the policies and procedures of the department of administration to meet the financial reporting and federal single audit requirements and deadlines of this state. j. If an organization fails to submit accurate and complete final financial statements or information to the department of administration on or before October 31 of a year pursuant to subsection I of this section, the department of administration shall assess a penalty of one twelfth of one percent of the organization's state general fund appropriation for the ensuing fiscal year for every thirty days the submission is late and shall withhold the penalty amount from the organization's state general fund appropriation allotment schedule for the ensuing fiscal year. The total penalty assessed pursuant to this subsection in any fiscal year may not exceed $8,000,000 or one percent of the organization's state general fund appropriation for the fiscal year in which the penalty is assessed, whichever is less. K. Each organization that is included in the state's reporting entity as defined by generally accepted governmental accounting principles and that spends federal monies shall submit all necessary, accurate and complete final federal expenditure or program information to the department of administration to meet the federal single audit requirements and deadlines. L. If an organization fails to submit accurate and complete final federal expenditure or program information to the department of administration on or before December 31 of a year pursuant to subsection K of this section, the department of administration shall assess a penalty of one twelfth of one percent of the organization's state general fund appropriation for the ensuing fiscal year for every thirty days the submission is late and shall withhold the penalty amount from the organization's state general fund appropriation allotment SCHEDULE for the ensuing year. The total penalty assessed pursuant to this section in any fiscal year may not exceed $8,000,000 or one percent of the organization's state general fund appropriation for the fiscal year in which the penalty is assessed, whichever is less. M. The maximum total penalty amounts prescribed in subsections J and L of this section shall be annually adjusted by the percentage increase or decrease in the maximum amount of monies available in the state general fund for legislative appropriations as determined and published by the economic estimates commission pursuant to section 41-562. END_STATUTE